Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1063
Governmental unit; energy financing contracts; authorized.

Notwithstanding the procedures for public lettings in sections 73-101 to 73-106 or any other statute of the State of Nebraska relating to the letting of bids by a governmental unit, a governmental unit may enter into an energy financing contract with an energy service company pursuant to sections 66-1062 to 66-1066.

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 10.